Alaska statutes. Title 21. Insurance.
Chapter 22. Insurance Holding Companies.

Administrative Code. —

For insurance holding companies, see 3 AAC 21, art. 1.

Sec. 21.22.010.
Filing requirements for acquisition of control of or merger with domestic insurer.

Until the provisions of (b) of this section have been fulfilled, a person may not

unless the person is an issuer, make a tender or an offer for or a request or an invitation for tenders of, or enter into any agreement to exchange securities for, seek to acquire, or acquire, in the open market or otherwise, any voting security of a domestic insurer if, after the purchase, the person would, directly or indirectly or by conversion or by exercise of any right to acquire, be in control of the insurer; or

enter into an agreement to merge with or otherwise to acquire control of a domestic insurer or a person controlling a domestic insurer.

A statement containing the information required by AS

21.22.020

shall be filed by the person making a proposal described in (a) of this section with the director before the time copies of the proposal are first published, sent, or given to security holders of the insurer. The insurer shall publish, send, or give copies of the statement to the insurer’s stockholders. The proposal is subject to approval by the director under AS

21.22.030

.

If a proposal described in (a) of this section is to be made by means of a registration statement under 15 U.S.C. 77a — 77aa (Securities Act of 1933) or in circumstances requiring the disclosure of similar information under 15 U.S.C. 78a — 78mm (Securities Exchange Act of 1934), or under a state law requiring similar registration or disclosure, the person required to file the statement under (b) of this section may use those documents in furnishing the information called for by that statement.

If the person required to file the statement under (b) of this section is a partnership, limited partnership, syndicate, or other group, the director may require that the information be given with respect to each

partner of the partnership or limited partnership;

member of the syndicate or group; and

person who controls a partner or member.

If any person, partner, or member required to file the statement under (b) of this section is a corporation, the director may require that the information be given with respect to

that corporation;

each officer and director of that corporation; and

each person who is directly or indirectly the beneficial owner of more than 10 percent of the outstanding voting securities of that corporation.

If any material change occurs in the facts set out in the statement filed with the director and sent to the insurer under this section, an amendment setting out the change, together with copies of all documents and other material relevant to the change, shall be filed with the director and sent to the insurer within two business days after the person learns of the change. The insurer shall send the amendment to its shareholders.

The provisions of this section do not apply to an offer, request, invitation, agreement, or acquisition that the director by order may exempt as not having been made or entered into for the purpose and not having the effect of changing or influencing the control of the domestic insurer.

A person controlling a domestic insurer seeking to divest, in any manner, its controlling interest in the domestic insurer shall file with the director, and provide a copy to the insurer, confidential notice of the person’s proposed divestiture at least 30 days before the cessation of control. The director shall determine whether a party seeking to divest or to acquire a controlling interest in an insurer is required to file for and obtain approval of the transaction. The information is confidential until the conclusion of the transaction unless the director, in the director’s discretion, determines that confidential treatment will interfere with enforcement of this section. If a statement referred to in (b) of this section is otherwise filed, this subsection does not apply.

For a transaction subject to this section, an acquiring person also shall file a preacquisition notification with the director that contains the information set out in AS

21.22.065(c)

. A failure to file the notification may be subject to penalties specified in AS

21.22.065(i)

.

In this section, “domestic insurer” includes any person controlling a domestic insurer unless that person is either directly or through its affiliates primarily engaged in business other than the business of insurance. In this subsection, “person” includes a securities broker holding, in the usual and customary broker’s function, more than 20 percent of the voting securities of an insurer or of a person controlling an insurer.

History.

(§ 1 ch 202 SLA 1976; am § 30 ch 62 SLA 1995; am § 21 ch 72 SLA 2000; am §§ 20 — 23 ch 34 SLA 2015)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2010, in subsection (g), paragraph numbers were removed to reflect the repeal of former (g)(1).

Subsections (h) and (i) were enacted as (i) and (j); relettered in 2015, at which time former subsection (h) was relettered as (j).

Effect of amendments. —

The 2015 amendment, effective July 1, 2015, in (a)(1), added “unless the person is an issuer,” at the beginning, in (a)(2) added “or a person controlling a domestic insurer” at the end; in (c), deleted the last sentence, which read, “However, the director may require the person making the proposal to produce other information the director considers necessary to carry out the duties of the director under this chapter.”; in (h) [now (j)], added the second sentence; added (i) [now (h)] and (j) [now (i)].

Sec. 21.22.020.
Content of statement for acquisition or merger filing.

The statement to be filed with the director under AS

21.22.010

shall be made under oath or affirmation and must contain the following information:

the name and address of each person by whom or on whose behalf the merger or other acquisition of control referred to in AS

21.22.010

is to be effected, who will be called the “acquiring party,” as follows:

if the person is an individual, the principal occupation of the person and all offices and positions held during the past five years, and all felony convictions and misdemeanor convictions involving moral turpitude during the past 10 years;

if the person is not an individual,

a report of the nature of its business operations during the past five years or for whatever lesser period the person and any of its predecessors have been in existence;

an informative description of the business intended to be done by the person and the person’s subsidiaries; and

a list of all individuals who are or who have been selected to become directors or executive officers of the person, or who perform or will perform functions appropriate to those positions; the list shall include for each individual under this sub-subparagraph the information required by (A) of this paragraph;

a description of the consideration used or to be used in effecting the merger or other acquisition of control, including

the source, nature, and amount;

a description of any transaction in which funds were or are to be obtained for a purpose under this paragraph; and

the identity of persons furnishing the consideration; however, if a source of the consideration is a loan made in the lender’s ordinary course of business, the director shall keep the identity of the lender confidential, if the person filing the statement so requests;

fully audited financial information as to the earnings and financial condition of each acquiring party for the preceding five fiscal years or for whatever lesser period that an acquiring party and any predecessors of the acquiring party have been in existence, and similar unaudited information as of a date not earlier than 90 days before the filing of the statement;

any plans or proposals that each acquiring party may have to

liquidate the insurer;

sell its assets or merge or consolidate it with any person; or

make any other material change in its business or corporate structure or management;

the number of shares of any security referred to in AS 21.22.010 that each acquiring party proposes to acquire, the terms of the offer, request, invitation, agreement, or acquisition referred to in this chapter, and a statement as to the method by which the fairness of the proposal was determined;

the amount of each class of any security referred to in AS 21.22.010 that is beneficially owned or concerning which there is a right to acquire beneficial ownership by each acquiring party;

a full description of any contracts, arrangements, or understandings with respect to any security referred to in AS 21.22.010 in which an acquiring party is involved, including transfer of any of the securities, joint ventures, loan or option arrangements, puts or calls, guarantees of loans, guarantees against loss or guarantees of profits, division of losses or profits, or the giving or withholding of proxies; this description must identify the persons with whom the contracts, arrangements, or understandings have been entered into;

a description of the purchase of any security referred to in AS 21.22.010 during the 12 calendar months preceding the filing of the statement by an acquiring party, including the dates of purchase, the names of the purchasers, and consideration paid or agreed to be paid;

a description of any recommendations to purchase a security referred to in AS 21.22.010 made during the 12 calendar months preceding the filing of the statement by an acquiring party or by anyone based on interviews or at the suggestion of the acquiring party;

copies of all tender offers for, requests or invitations for tenders of exchange offers for, and agreements to acquire or exchange any securities referred to in AS 21.22.010 and, if distributed, of additional soliciting material;

the terms of any agreement, contract, or understanding made with a broker-dealer as to solicitation of securities referred to in AS 21.22.010 for tender and the amount of any fees, commissions, or other compensation to be paid to a broker-dealer;

any additional information as the director may by order or regulation prescribe as necessary or appropriate for the protection of policyholders and security holders of the insurer or in the public interest.

In addition to the other requirements in this section, a person required to file a statement under AS

21.22.010

shall provide

the annual enterprise risk statement specified in AS

21.22.060(n)

for so long as control exists; and

an acknowledgment that the person and all subsidiaries within the person’s control in the insurance holding company system will provide information to the director upon request as necessary to evaluate enterprise risk to the insurer.

In this section, “consideration” includes a pledge of the stock of an insurer or the insurer’s subsidiary.

History.

(§ 1 ch 202 SLA 1976; am § 24 ch 34 SLA 2015; am § 69 ch 13 SLA 2019)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2015 amendment, effective July 1, 2015, added (b) and (c).

The 2019 amendment, effective October 17, 2019, made a stylistic change in (a)(1), in (a)(1)(B)(iii) substituted “each individual under this subsubparagraph” for “each such individual” following shall include for”, in (a)(2)(B) substituted “for a purpose under this paragraph” for “for any such purpose”, made stylistic changes in (a)(3) and (5), in (a)(7) deleted “but not limited to” following “including” and made a stylistic change, made stylistic changes in (a)(8) through (12).

Sec. 21.22.030.
Hearing, findings, and approval.

The director shall approve a merger or other acquisition of control referred to in AS

21.22.010

unless, after a public hearing, the director finds that

after the change of control, the domestic insurer referred to in AS

21.22.010

would not be able to satisfy the requirements for the issuance of a license to write the line or lines of insurance for which it is presently licensed;

the effect of the merger or other acquisitions of control would be substantially to lessen competition in insurance in this state or tend to create a monopoly in this state;

the financial condition of an acquiring party is such that it might jeopardize the financial stability of the insurer or prejudice the interest of its policyholders or the interests of any remaining securityholders who are unaffiliated with the acquiring party;

the terms of the offer, request, invitation, agreement, or acquisition referred to in AS 21.22.010 are unfair and unreasonable to the securityholders of the insurer;

the plans or proposals that the acquiring party has to liquidate the insurer, sell its assets, or consolidate or merge it with any person, or to make any other material change in its business or corporate structure or management, are unfair and unreasonable to policyholders of the insurer and not in the public interest;

the competence, experience, and integrity of those persons who would control the operation of the insurer are such that it would not be in the interest of policyholders of the insurer and of the public to permit the merger or other acquisition of control; or

the acquisition is likely to be hazardous or prejudicial to the insurance-buying public.

The public hearing referred to in (a) of this section must be held within 60 days after the statement required by AS

21.22.010

is filed and determined to be complete by the director. The director shall give notice of at least 20 days of the hearing to the person filing the statement. The person filing the statement shall give notice of at least seven days of the hearing to the insurer and to other persons as may be designated by the director. The director shall issue a decision within the 60-day period preceding the effective date of the proposed transaction. The procedure in AS

21.06.210

applies to a public hearing under this section.

In evaluating the effect of a merger or other acquisition under (a)(2) of this section, the

information requirements of AS

21.22.065(c)(1)

and the standards of AS

21.22.065(d)(1)

, (2), and (e) apply;

merger or other acquisition may not be disapproved if the director finds that a situation meeting the criteria in AS

21.22.065(g)

exists; and

director may condition the approval of the merger or other acquisition on the removal of a basis for disapproval within a specified period.

The director may retain at the acquiring person’s expense an attorney, actuary, accountant, or other expert not otherwise a part of the director’s staff, if reasonably necessary to assist the director in reviewing the proposed acquisition of control.

If the proposed acquisition of control would require the approval of more than one insurance regulator, the public hearing referred to under (a) and (b) of this section may be held on a consolidated basis upon request of the person filing the statement referred to in AS

21.22.010

. That person shall file the statement referred to in AS

21.22.010

with the National Association of Insurance Commissioners within five days after making the request for a public hearing. The director may opt out of a consolidated hearing and shall provide notice to the applicant of the opt-out within 10 days after receipt of the statement referred to in AS 21.22.010. A hearing conducted on a consolidated basis must be public and must be held within the United States before the insurance regulators of the states in which the insurers are domiciled. The director may attend the hearing in person or telephonically.

History.

(§ 1 ch 202 SLA 1976; am § 36 ch 67 SLA 1992; am § 31 ch 62 SLA 1995; am § 17 ch 96 SLA 2004; am §§ 25 — 27 ch 34 SLA 2015)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2015 amendment, effective July 1, 2015, repealed and reenacted (b), which read, “The purchase, merger, or other acquisition of control referred to in AS

21.22.010(a)

may not be made until the director either approves the transaction within 60 days after the statement required by AS

21.22.010(b)

has been filed or the director fails to disapprove the transaction within the 60-day period.”; repealed and reenacted (c), which read, “When evaluating the effect of a merger or other acquisition under (a)(2) of this section, the director may consider relevant factors including market shares, volatility of ranking market leaders, number of competitors, concentration, trend of concentration in the industry, and ease of entry into and exit out of the market, but may not consider the standards under AS 21.22.065(d)(3), (4), or (e).”; added (e).

Sec. 21.22.040.
Mailings to shareholders and expenses.

All statements, amendments, or other material filed under AS

21.22.010

, and all notices of public hearings held under AS

21.22.030

, shall be mailed by the insurer to its shareholders within five business days after the insurer has received those statements, amendments, other materials, or notices.
The expenses of mailing shall be borne by the person making the filing.
As security for the payment of those expenses, the person making the filing shall file with the director an acceptable bond or other deposit in an amount to be determined by the director.

History.

(§ 1 ch 202 SLA 1976)

Sec. 21.22.050.
Jurisdiction and consent to service.

The courts of this state are given jurisdiction over every person not resident, domiciled, or authorized to do business in this state who files a statement with the director under this chapter and over all actions involving that person arising out of violations of this chapter, and each person is considered to have performed acts equivalent to and constituting an appointment of the director to be the lawful attorney of the person upon whom may be served all lawful process in any action or proceeding arising out of a violation of this chapter.
Copies of all lawful process shall be transmitted by registered or certified mail by the director to the person at the last known address of the person.

History.

(§ 1 ch 202 SLA 1976)

Sec. 21.22.060.
Registration required.

Except as provided in (c) of this section, an insurer that is authorized to do business in this state and that is a member of an insurance holding company system shall register with the director. An insurer that is subject to registration under this section shall register not later than 15 days after the insurer becomes subject to registration, unless the director, for good cause shown, extends the time for registration; if the time is extended, the insurer shall register within the extended time.

An insurer subject to registration shall file a registration statement, on a form provided by the director, that must contain current information about

the capital structure, general financial condition, ownership, and management of the insurer and any person controlling the insurer;

the identity and relationship of every member of the insurance holding company system;

the following agreements in force and transactions currently outstanding or that have occurred in the last calendar year between the insurer and its affiliates:

loans, other investments, or purchases, sales, or exchanges of securities of the affiliates by the insurer or of the insurer by its affiliates;

purchases, sales, or exchanges of assets;

transactions not in the ordinary course of business;

guarantees or undertakings for the benefit of an affiliate that result in an actual contingent exposure of the insurer’s assets to liability, other than insurance contracts entered into in the ordinary course of the insurer’s business;

all management and service contracts and all cost-sharing arrangements;

reinsurance agreements;

dividends and other distributions to shareholders; and

consolidated tax allocation agreements;

other matters concerning transactions between registered insurers and any affiliates that may be included from time to time in a registration form adopted or approved by the director;

a pledge of the insurer’s stock, including stock of a subsidiary or controlling affiliate, for a loan made to a member of the insurance holding company system;

if requested by the director, the financial statements of or within an insurance holding company system, including all affiliates or the most recently filed parent corporation financial statements that have been filed with the United States Securities and Exchange Commission; financial statements may include annual audited financial statements filed with the United States Securities and Exchange Commission under 15 U.S.C. 77a — 77aa (Securities Act of 1933), as amended, or 15 U.S.C. 78a — 78pp (Securities Exchange Act of 1934), as amended;

statements that the insurer’s board of directors is responsible for and oversees corporate governance and internal controls and that the insurer’s officers or senior management have approved, implemented, and continue to maintain and monitor corporate governance and internal control procedures; and

other information required by the director by regulation.

An authorized insurer is not required to register under (a) of this section if the insurer is a member of a holding company system subject to registration requirements and standards under the laws or regulations of its state of domicile that are substantially similar to those contained in this chapter, except that the director may require the insurer to file a copy of the registration statement, the summary outline as described in (l) of this section, or other information filed in its state of domicile.

Information need not be disclosed on the registration statement filed under (b) of this section if that information is not material for the purposes of this section. Unless the director by regulation or order provides otherwise, sales, purchases, exchanges, loans or extensions of credit, investments, or the aggregate of a series of related transactions, involving one-half of one percent or less of an insurer’s admitted assets or five percent or less of the policyholder’s surplus as of the 31st day of December of the calendar year in which the transaction took place are not considered material for purposes of this section.

Each registered insurer shall keep current the information required to be disclosed in its registration statement by reporting all material changes or additions on amendment forms provided by the director within 30 days after the end of the month in which it learns of each change or addition; however, subject to AS

21.22.100

, each registered insurer shall report all dividends and other distributions to shareholders within 15 business days following their declaration.

The director shall terminate the registration of an insurer that demonstrates that it no longer is a member of an insurance holding company system.

The director may require or allow two or more affiliated insurers subject to registration under this section to file a consolidated registration statement or consolidated reports amending their consolidated registration statement or their individual registration statements.

The director may allow an insurer that is authorized to do business in this state and that is part of an insurance holding company system to register on behalf of an affiliated insurer that is required to register under (a) of this section and to file all information and material required to be filed under this section.

This section does not apply to any insurer, information, or transaction to the extent that the director by regulation or order exempts the insurer, information, or transaction from this section.

A person may file with the director a disclaimer of affiliation with an authorized insurer or the disclaimer may be filed by the insurer or a member of an insurance holding company system. The disclaimer must fully disclose all material relationships and bases for affiliation between that person and that insurer as well as the basis for disclaiming the affiliation. A disclaimer of affiliation is considered granted unless the director, within 30 days after receipt of a complete disclaimer, notifies the disclaiming party that the disclaimer is disallowed. If the disclaimer is disallowed, the disclaiming party may request a hearing under AS

21.06.180

—

21.06.240

.

An insurer subject to registration under (a) of this section shall register annually by May 1 of each year for the previous calendar year unless, for good cause shown, the director extends the time for registration. The director may require an insurer that is allowed to register as provided under (c) of this section to furnish a copy of

the registration statement;

the summary specified in (l) of this section; or

other information filed by the insurer with the insurance regulatory authority of the insurer’s state of domicile.

An annual registration statement filed under (k) of this section must contain a summary outline of items in the current registration statement representing changes from the prior registration statement.

A person within an insurance holding company system subject to registration shall provide complete and accurate information to an insurer, where the information is reasonably necessary to enable the insurer to comply with the provisions of this chapter.

The ultimate controlling person of an insurer subject to registration shall file an annual enterprise risk report. The report must, to the best of the ultimate controlling person’s knowledge and belief, identify the material risks within the insurance holding company system that may pose enterprise risk to the insurer. The report shall be filed with the lead state insurance regulator of the insurance holding company system as determined by the procedures in the Financial Analysis Handbook adopted by the National Association of Insurance Commissioners.

History.

(§ 1 ch 202 SLA 1976; am § 37 ch 67 SLA 1992; am §§ 32 — 35 ch 62 SLA 1995; am § 34 ch 23 SLA 2011; am §§ 28 — 33 ch 34 SLA 2015)

Administrative Code. —

For insurance holding companies, see 3 AAC 21, art. 1.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2015 amendment, effective July 1, 2015, in (a), in the first sentence, substituted “Except as provided in (c) of this section an insurer” for “Every insurer”, in the second sentence substituted “shall register not later than 15 days after the insurer becomes subject to registration” for “shall register within 60 days after January 1, 1977 or 15 days after it becomes subject to registration, whichever is later”; in (b), substituted “An” for “Every” at the beginning of the introductory language, in (b)(2), inserted “and relationship” following “the identity”, in (b)(3), substituted “and transactions currently outstanding or that have occurred in the last calendar year” for “, relationships subsisting, and transactions currently outstanding”, added (b)(3)(G) and (3)(H), added (b)(5), (6), (7), and (8); rewrote (c), which read, “The director may permit an authorized insurer that is a member of a holding company system subject to registration under the laws or regulations of its state of domicile that are in the opinion of the director substantially similar to those contained in this chapter to satisfy the requirements of (a) of this section by filing a statement in accordance with the laws of its state of domicile.”; in (e), substituted “within 15 business days following their declaration” for “within two business days following their declaration” at the end; in (j), added the third sentence, and deleted “After a disclaimer has been filed, the insurer is relieved of any duty to register or report under this section that may arise out of the insurer’s relationship with that person until the director disallows the disclaimer. The director shall disallow a disclaimer only after furnishing all parties in interest with notice and opportunity to be heard and after making specific findings of fact to support the disallowance.”; added (m) and (n).

Sec. 21.22.065.
Acquisitions involving change of control.

Unless exempted in (j) of this section, this section applies to any acquisition in which there is a change in control of an insurer authorized to do business in this state.

If an acquisition violates the standards established in (d) and (f) of this section, the director may enter an order requiring an involved insurer to cease doing business in this state with respect to the line or lines of insurance involved in the violation or denying the application of an acquired or acquiring insurer for a license to do business in this state. Within 30 days of the issuance of the order, the involved insurer may submit a plan to remedy the anticompetitive effect of the acquisition within a reasonable time. Based upon a plan or other information submitted, the director shall specify the conditions, if any, under a time period during which the aspects of the acquisition causing a violation of the standards of this section would be remedied and the order vacated or modified. The order is stayed by the insurer’s submission of a plan and shall be rescinded if the acquisition is not consummated.

An acquisition that meets the requirements under (a) of this section is subject to an order under (b) of this section unless the acquiring person files a preacquisition notification and the waiting period has expired. The person to be acquired may file a preacquisition notification. A preacquisition notification by a person to be acquired may not be filed in place of a preacquisition filing by an acquiring person. The preacquisition notification

must be in a form and contain the information prescribed in regulations adopted by the director relating to insurance markets that, under (j)(5) of this section, cause the acquisition not to be exempt from the provisions of this section; the director may require additional material and information the director considers necessary to determine whether the proposed acquisition, if consummated, would violate the competitive standards of this section;

may include an opinion of an economist regarding the competitive effect of the acquisition in this state accompanied by a summary of the education and experience indicating the economist’s ability to render an informed opinion; and

must be followed by a waiting period beginning on the date of receipt by the director of a preacquisition notification and ending on the earlier of the 30th day after the date of receipt or termination of the waiting period by the director unless, before the end of the waiting period, the director requires the submission of additional information relevant to the proposed acquisition, in which event the waiting period shall end on the 30th day after receipt of the additional information by the director or termination of the waiting period by the director, whichever is earlier.

The director may enter an order under (b) of this section regarding an acquisition if the insurer fails to file adequate information in compliance with (c) of this section or if there is substantial evidence that the acquisition may substantially lessen competition, create a monopoly in a line of insurance in this state or significantly increase an insurer’s market concentration. In determining whether an acquisition violates competitive standards under this subsection, the director shall consider the following:

an acquisition covered under (a) of this section involving two or more insurers competing in the same market is prima facie evidence of a violation of the competitive standards

if the market is highly concentrated and the involved insurers possess the following shares of the market:

if the market is not highly concentrated and the involved insurers possess the following shares of the market:

an acquisition covered under (a) of this section involving two or more insurers competing in the same market is prima facie evidence of violation of the competitive standard if

there is a significant trend toward increased concentration in the market, which occurs when the aggregate market share of any grouping of the largest insurers in the market, from the two largest to the eighth largest, has increased by seven percent or more of the market over a period extending from any base year five to 10 years before the acquisition up to the date of the acquisition;

one of the insurers involved is an insurer in a grouping of large insurers showing the requisite increase in market share; and

another involved insurer’s market share is two percent or more.

A percentage not shown in the tables contained in (d) of this section may be interpolated proportionately to the percentage that is shown. The insurer with the largest share of the market shall be considered Insurer A. If more than two insurers are involved, a market share that exceeds the total of the two columns in the table by the insurers involved is prima facie evidence of a violation of the competitive standards contained in (d) of this section.

Even though an acquisition does not violate the competitive standard under (d) of this section, the director may establish the requisite anticompetitive effect based upon other substantial evidence. Even though an acquisition does violate the competitive standard under (d) of this section, a party may establish the absence of the requisite anticompetitive effect based upon other substantial evidence. Relevant factors in making a determination under (d) of this section include market shares, volatility of ranking of market leaders, number of competitors, concentration, trend of concentration in the industry, and ease of entry into and exit out of the market. The burden of showing substantial evidence of a violation of the competitive standards rests with the director.

An order may not be entered under (b) of this section if

the acquisition will yield substantial economy of scale or economy in resource utilization that cannot be achieved in another way and the public benefits that would arise from the economy exceed the public benefits that would arise from not lessening competition; or

the acquisition will substantially increase the availability of insurance and the public benefits of the increase exceed the public benefits that would arise from not lessening competition.

A person who violates a cease and desist order of the director under (b) of this section may, after hearing and on order of the director, be subject to the suspension or revocation of a license, a civil penalty not to exceed $10,000 for each day of violation, or both.

An insurer or other person who fails to make a preacquisition filing required by (c) of this section and who also fails to demonstrate a good faith effort to comply with filing requirements shall be subject to a fine of not more than $50,000.

This section does not apply to

an acquisition subject to approval or disapproval by the director under AS

21.22.010

;

a purchase of securities solely for investment purposes if the securities are not used by voting or otherwise to cause or attempt to cause the substantial lessening of competition in an insurance market in this state; if a purchase of securities for investment purposes results in a presumption of control under AS

21.22.200

(3), it is not solely for investment purposes unless the insurance supervisory official of the insurer’s state of domicile accepts a disclaimer of control or affirmatively finds that control does not exist and the disclaimer action or affirmative finding is communicated by the domiciliary insurance supervisory official to the director;

the acquisition of a person by another person resulting in a change of control of an insurer when both persons are neither directly nor through affiliates primarily engaged in the business of insurance if preacquisition notification is filed with the director under (c) of this section 30 days before the proposed effective date of the acquisition; however, the preacquisition notification is not required for exclusion if the acquisition would otherwise be excluded under this subsection;

the acquisition of an already affiliated person;

an acquisition if, as an immediate result of the acquisition,

the combined market share of the involved insurers would not exceed five percent of a market;

there would not be an increase in a market share of the larger writer; or

the combined market share of the involved insurers would not exceed 12 percent of a market and the market share of the larger writer would not increase by more than two percent of a market;

an acquisition for which a preacquisition notification would be required under this section due solely to the resulting effect on the ocean marine insurance line of business; or

an acquisition of an insurer whose domiciliary supervisory insurance official affirmatively finds that the insurer is in a failing condition, there are no feasible alternatives to improving this condition, the public benefits of improving the insurer’s condition through the acquisition exceed the public benefits that would arise from not lessening competition, and these findings are communicated by the domiciliary supervisory insurance official to this state’s director.

AS

21.22.150

,

21.22.160

, and

21.22.180

do not apply to acquisitions covered under this section.

Insurer A Insurer B 4 percent 4 percent or more 10 percent 2 percent or more 15 percent 1 percent or more;

Click to view

Insurer A Insurer B 5 percent 5 percent or more 10 percent 4 percent or more 15 percent 3 percent or more 19 percent 1 percent or more.

Click to view

History.

(§ 38 ch 67 SLA 1992; am § 16 ch 8 SLA 2011; am § 34 ch 34 SLA 2015)

Administrative Code. —

For insurance holding companies, see 3 AAC 21, art. 1.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2015 amendment, effective July 1, 2015, in (d), reorganized the subsection, incorporating the content of former (d)(1) and (d)(2) into the introductory language and adding the last sentence; the content of (d)(3), related to determination of the existence of substantial evidence, was deleted, and the content of (d)(4) became part of (d)(1), while in the introductory language of (d)(1), “prima facie” was inserted preceding “evidence of a violation”, (d)(2) was added, and related and stylistic changes were made throughout.

Sec. 21.22.070.
Review by director.

If at any time the director determines that any material transaction entered into between an insurer and any of its affiliates does not meet the standards set out in AS

21.22.080

, the director may, after hearings conducted in accordance with AS 21.06, require the insurer and the affiliate to terminate, set aside, or modify the transaction as considered appropriate by the director to make the transaction conform to those standards.
An insurer may submit a proposed material transaction to the director for review and the director may issue an opinion that the transaction meets the standard set out in AS

21.22.080

.
The opinion creates a rebuttable presumption that neither the insurer, director, officer, employee, nor agent committed a wilful violation of this chapter by entering into the transaction.
The opinion does not prohibit the director from subsequently exercising authority under this section.

History.

(§ 1 ch 202 SLA 1976)

Administrative Code. —

For insurance holding companies, see 3 AAC 21, art. 1.